Illinois, session 104th, SB44.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 52-3.206 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.206 new)7    Sec. 2-3.206. Grants for electric vehicles. 8    (a) As used in this Section, "electric vehicle" means a 9battery-powered electric vehicle operated solely by 10electricity.11    (b) Subject to appropriation, beginning with the 2025-2026 12school year, the State Board of Education shall award 13competitive grants on an annual basis to school districts that 14submit a grant application to the State Board of Education 15requesting funds to purchase an electric vehicle to be used 16for student driver education courses in accordance with 17Section 27-24.2 of this Code.18    (c) The State Board of Education shall annually 19disseminate a request for applications for grants under this 20Section to school districts that offer a driver education 21course. Grant applications shall be accepted on an annual 22basis. The State Board of Education shall establish procedures 23for submitting requests for grants and issuing funds to   SB0044- 2 -LRB104 03011 LNS 13029 b1approved applicants.2    (d) If the appropriation for grants under this Section for 3a given fiscal year is less than the amount required to fund 4all applications for grants, the State Board of Education 5shall give priority to school districts designated as Tier 1 6or Tier 2 pursuant to paragraph (3) of subsection (g) of 7Section 18-8.15 of this Code that (i) do not have any electric 8vehicles, (ii) possess below a sufficient amount of vehicles 9to meet student demand for the district's driver education 10courses offered, and (iii) have applied for grant funds.11    (e) The application for grants under this Section must 12include the following information:13        (1) the school district's tier designation pursuant to 14    paragraph (3) of subsection (g) of Section 18-8.15 of this 15    Code;16        (2) the number of students participating in the school 17    district's driver education courses and the number of 18    students on any wait list to participate in the district's 19    driver education courses;20        (3) the number of electric vehicles, if any, and 21    gasoline-powered vehicles the school district currently 22    possesses for the driver education courses offered;23        (4) the condition of each vehicle that the school 24    district uses for the driver education courses offered; 25    and26        (5) a plan detailing how the school district will   SB0044- 3 -LRB104 03011 LNS 13029 b1    properly maintain, charge, and store the electric vehicle 2    once purchased.3    (f) The State Board of Education may adopt any rules 4necessary for the implementation of this Section.